Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-122
Drainage improvements; deficiencies; supplemental assessments.

In case of deficiencies appearing after the original assessment, supplemental assessments upon the proportional fixed by the main assessment may be made on the lands benefited to make up such deficiency, and the annual interest on such bonds shall be made from annual levies made upon the lands benefited on the proportional of the assessments.

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 21, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 1739;

C.S.1922, § 1686;

C.S.1929, § 31-122;

R.S.1943, § 31-122.